Hawaii statutes.
[§327H-1] Pain patient's bill of
rights; findings. The legislature finds that:

(1) Inadequate treatment of severe acute pain and
severe chronic pain originating from cancer or noncancerous conditions is a
significant health problem;

(2) For some patients, pain management is the single
most important treatment a physician can provide;

(3) A patient who suffers from severe acute pain or
severe chronic pain should have access to proper treatment of pain;

(4) Due to the complexity of their problems, many
patients who suffer from severe acute pain or severe chronic pain may require
referral to a physician with expertise in the treatment of severe acute pain
and severe chronic pain. In some cases, severe acute pain and severe chronic
pain is best treated by a team of clinicians to address the associated
physical, psychological, social, and vocational issues;

(5) In the hands of knowledgeable, ethical, and
experienced pain management practitioners, opiates administered for severe
acute pain or severe chronic pain can be safe; and

(6) Opiates may be part of an overall treatment plan
for a patient in severe acute pain or severe chronic pain who has not obtained
relief from any other means of treatment. [L 2004, c 189, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next